California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
75506.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that members of the commission are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the commission, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to and constitutes the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 2.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75507.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to deal with the broad fields of advertising, promotion, marketing research, and production research of apples, and any other activity authorized in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [75511. - 75526.]

75511.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75511.5.

“Apple” means any variety of apple that is grown in this state and marketed for fresh consumption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75512.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75513.

“Commission” means the California Apple Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75514.

(a) “Districts” shall consist of the following:

(1) District 1 shall consist of the Counties of Imperial, Kern, San Bernardino, San Diego, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, and Ventura.

(2) District 2 shall consist of the Counties of Alpine, Fresno, Inyo, Kings, Madera, Mariposa, Merced, Mono, Monterey, San Benito, Tulare, and Tuolumne.

(3) District 3 shall consist of the Counties of Alameda, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Contra Costa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Glenn, Humboldt, Lake, Lassen, Marin,
 Mendocino, Modoc, Napa, Nevada, Placer, Plumas, Sacramento, San Francisco, San Joaquin, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Solano, Sonoma, Stanislaus, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Yolo, and Yuba.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), after the commission provides notice to all eligible producers, the number of districts and their boundaries may be changed by a two-thirds vote of the members of the commission, which is concurred in by the secretary. When there are two or more districts, there shall be similar total production among the districts to ensure proper representation. These boundaries need not coincide with county lines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 374, Sec. 5.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

75515.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75516.

“Handler” means any person engaged in packing apples for fresh consumption or engaged in marketing apples for fresh consumption that the person has produced or that the person is marketing on behalf of a producer either directly or through an agent, employee, broker, or otherwise, and who, upon request by the commission, provides proof that he or she is engaged in handler activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 5.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75518.

“Market” or “marketing” means to sell apples.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75519.

“Marketing research” means any research relating to the sale of apples.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75520.

“Marketing year” means the period beginning July 1 of each year and extending through June 30 of the following year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 8.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75520.5.

“Member” means a person who serves on the commission’s board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 9.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75521.

“Pack,” “packing,” or “packed” means the regular compact arrangement of all or part of the fruit in any container or subcontainer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75522.

“Person” means any individual, firm, corporation, association, or other entity doing business in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75523.

“Producer” means any person who is engaged in the business of producing, or causing to be produced, apples for market, and who, upon request of the commission, provides proof of commodity sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 10.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75524.

“Production research” means any research related to pest control and to the production, harvest, and postharvest handling of apples, other than marketing research.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 11.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75525.

“Sale” means the point at which the producer transfers title of apples in exchange for financial compensation or other valuable consideration. A sale may occur even though the purchased apples are not placed in normal marketing channels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75526.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 75514 by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 3.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Apple Commission [75531. - 75546.]

75531.

(a) There is in the state government the California Apple Commission.

(b) Pursuant to Section 75514, when there are two or more districts, the commission shall consist of a board of directors of three producers and one handler from each district, and one public member.

(c) Pursuant to Section 75514, when there is one statewide district, the commission shall consist of a board of directors of no less than six producers and one handler, as determined by a two-thirds vote of the commission’s board of directors, which is concurred in by the secretary, and one public member.

(d) The public member shall be appointed to the commission by the secretary from nominees recommended by other members of the commission.

(e) The secretary and other persons, as determined by the commission, shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 374, Sec. 6.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

75532.

(a) The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any activity or function of the commission that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease the specified activities or functions or to make corrections required by the secretary, the secretary, upon written notice, may suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of the activities or functions, as required by the secretary, has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Any action of the commission in violation of the written notice is without legal force or effect. The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions that are the subject of the written notice.

(d) At the same time the written notice is provided to the commission, the secretary shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts that the secretary determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, the secretary’s reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and the secretary’s recommendations with respect to any action that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 15.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75533.

The commission or the secretary may bring an action for judicial relief from the secretary’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, as the case may be, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other appropriate relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 16.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75534.

If the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the commission, the secretary shall concur, refuse to concur, or request additional information from the commission within 15 working days from the date the secretary receives the notification of the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 17.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75535.

The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. However, a court, if it finds that the secretary acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, may relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the secretary’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 18.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75536.

(a) Alternate members shall be selected pursuant to procedures adopted by the commission.

(b) Any alternate member may serve in place of any absent member on the commission and shall have all of the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission.

(c) In the event of the death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, the alternate member shall act as a member of the commission until a qualified successor is elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 374, Sec. 7.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

75537.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to or serving on the commission as a member or alternate member to continue in his or her position due to a change in his or her status, thereby making the person ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, resignation, or disqualification, shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by a majority vote of all of the remaining members of the commission. The appointee shall meet all of the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member or alternate whose office he or she is to occupy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75538.

(a) Any producer member shall be a producer or an employee representing a producer who has a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, apples for market. Qualifications of producer members shall be maintained during their entire term of office.

(b) Any handler member, or employee representing that person, shall have a financial interest in marketing or packing apples for market. Qualifications of handler members shall be maintained during their entire term of office.

(c) The public member and alternate member on the commission, if appointed, shall have all of the
 powers, rights, and privileges of any other member or alternate member, respectively, on the commission. The public member and alternate member, if appointed, shall not have any financial interest in the apple industry.

(d) Not more than one member and one alternate member shall be persons employed by, or connected in a proprietary capacity with, the same corporation, firm, partnership, association, or business organization. Any alternate member serving on the commission who is employed by, or connected in a proprietary capacity with, a person serving as a member on the commission from the same company, firm, partnership, or business organization shall serve as an alternate to the member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 374, Sec. 8.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

75539.

The term of office of each member, except ex officio members, is four years, commencing with the beginning of the marketing year following the member’s election and until a qualified successor is elected or appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 374, Sec. 9.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

75541.

The commission may sue and be sued, enter into contracts, and adopt a seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 374, Sec. 10.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

75542.

A quorum of the commission is a majority of the voting members. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum constitutes the act of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 23.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75543.

The secretary or his or her representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission and any committee meeting of the commission. However, the secretary may not attend an executive session of the commission called for the purpose of discussing potential or actual litigation against the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 24.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75544.

No member or alternate member of the commission, or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, shall receive any compensation. Each member of the commission or each alternate member serving in place of a member, except ex officio members, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, may receive necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances as approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 25.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75545.

All funds received by any person from the assessments levied under the authority of this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks which the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent or agents designated by the commission for that purpose. The agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in an amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75546.

The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the funds collected by the commission. No member, alternate member, employee, or agent of the commission is personally liable for the contracts of the commission nor is any such person responsible individually in any way to any producer or any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as a principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member, alternate member, employee, or agent of the commission, is responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member, alternate member, employee, or agent of the commission. Liability is several and not joint, and no member, alternate member, employee, or agent of the commission is liable for the default of any other member, alternate member, employee, or agent of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [75581. - 75603.]

75581.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but are not limited to, all of those specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75582.

The commission may adopt, amend, and repeal regulations and operating procedures necessary to carry out this chapter, including regulations governing appeals from actions taken by the commission pursuant to any of its regulations or operating procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 29.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75583.

The commission may administer and enforce this chapter and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, or deemed reasonably necessary for, the proper or advisable implementation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75584.

The commission may appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and other officers as it deems necessary. The officers have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75585.

The commission may employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and chief executive officer of the commission, and other personnel, including legal counsel, necessary to carry out this chapter. The commission may retain a management firm or the staff from any board, commission, or agency of the state or federal government to perform the functions prescribed by this section under the control of the commission. If any person employed by the commission engages in any conduct that the secretary determines is not in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter, the secretary shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the commission. If the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the secretary, the secretary may suspend or discharge the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 30.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75586.

The commission may fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75587.

The commission may appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission to advise the commission in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75588.

The commission may establish offices and incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, create liabilities, borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments, and repay producers for costs incurred during the initial formation of the commission, as may be necessary, in the opinion of the commission, for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75589.

The commission shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all its dealings that shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary. A summary of the audit shall be reported to all producers and a copy of the summary shall also be submitted to the secretary. In addition, the secretary, as he or she determines necessary, may conduct, or cause to be conducted, a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 31.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75590.

The commission may present facts to, and negotitate with, state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters which affect this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75591.

The commission may make, in its name, contracts to receive or render services in formulating and conducting plans and programs and any other contracts or agreements that the commission deems necesary for carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75592.

The commission may conduct, and contract with others to conduct, production research, including the study, analysis, accumulation, and dissemination of information obtained from that research or otherwise, regarding this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75593.

The commission may accept contributions of private, state, or federal funds, and make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies, for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75594.

The commission may promote the sale of apples by advertising and other promotional means, including cost sharing advertising, for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new and larger intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets for apples, and to educate and instruct the public with respect to the uses, healthful properties, and nutritional value of apples.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75595.

The commission may collect information, and publish and distribute without charge, bulletins and other communications for dissemination of information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 32.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75595.5.

The commission may establish an annual assessment rate to defray the operating costs of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 33.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75596.

The commission shall adopt an annual budget according to accepted practices. The secretary shall concur in the adoption of the budget prior to the encumbrance of funds, except for encumbrances necessary to pay the compensation of employees of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 34.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75597.

The commission shall annually prepare and submit to the secretary, for his or her concurrence, a statement of contemplated activities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 35.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75598.

The commission and the secretary shall keep confidential and shall not disclose, except when required by court order in a judicial proceeding, all lists of persons subject to this chapter in their possession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 36.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75599.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75601.

(a) The commission may recommend to the secretary the adoption of maturity and quality standards or product labeling standards, or engage in any other activity authorized pursuant to the California Marketing Act of 1937 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 58601) of Part 2 of Division 21) that are in accordance with the procedures specified in that act, unless otherwise specified in this article.

(b) Any standards that are adopted shall be implemented by the secretary at the beginning of the marketing year next succeeding the date on which they were approved by the secretary.

(c) Any standards recommended by the commission
 and approved by the secretary shall not be operative until approved by the vote specified in Section 75612.

(d) The commission shall serve as the advisory body to the secretary on all matters pertaining to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 188, Sec. 16.   (AB 1322)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75602.

(a) In order to prevent unfair trade practices, which are detrimental to California’s apple industry, including, but not limited to, deception and misinformation, the commission may collect and disseminate to any and all interested persons, handler F.O.B. market price information based on sales that have occurred.

(b) The identity of each handler reporting information and the information reported pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential and not made public by the commission under any circumstances. Information that gives industry totals, averages, and other similar data may be disclosed by the commission.

(c) The procedure for the collection and dissemination of the information pursuant to this section shall be approved by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 399, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

75603.

(a) In order to prevent the use of prohibited substances in organic apple production and processing that would undermine consumer confidence in the apples purchased and consumed, the commission may establish an organic apple certification program applicable to persons engaged in domestic organic production or processing of apples and to persons engaged in importing apples to determine whether they are in compliance with state and federal laws.

(b) The program’s operating procedures shall be subject to approval by the secretary.

(c) The identity of any person determined to be in violation of the program
 shall be provided to the public, the department, and any other state and federal agency responsible for the administration of laws related to organic products.

(d) The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out its duties and responsibilities pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.   (SB 982)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [75611. - 75619.]

75611.

(a) Within 90 days of the effective date of the amendments made to this section during the 1994 portion of the 1993–94 Regular Session of the Legislature, the secretary shall establish a list of producers eligible to vote. In establishing the list, the secretary may require that producers, handlers, and agricultural commissioners submit the names and mailing addresses of all known producers who are subject to this chapter. The secretary also may require that the information provided include the quantity of apples produced by each producer or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum vote specified in this article. The request for the information shall be in writing, and the requested information shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the request.

(b) Any person whose name does not appear upon the appropriate list may have his or her name placed on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a person eligible to vote. The absence of a person’s name from the list shall not exempt the person from paying assessments and shall not invalidate any industry votes conducted pursuant to this article.

(c) Proponents and opponents of the commission may contact producers on the lists in a form and manner prescribed by the commission as long as all expenses associated with the contacts are paid in advance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 40.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75612.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the secretary finds, in a referendum vote conducted by the secretary, that at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article have participated and that either one of the following has occurred:

(a) Sixty-five percent of the eligible producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the eligible producers so voting produced and marketed a majority of the total quantity of apples in the current marketing year by all of the eligible producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the eligible producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the eligible producers so voting produced and marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of apples in the current marketing year by all of the eligible producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 41.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75613.

The secretary shall establish a period to conduct the referendum that shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures that may be necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period to not more than 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 42.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75614.

The failure of an eligible producer to receive a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 43.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75615.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in this article, the secretary shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all persons whose names and addresses are on file with the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 44.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75616.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in this article, the secretary shall certify and declare this chapter inoperative. The secretary may conduct another implementation referendum vote one or more years after the previous vote has been taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 45.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75617.

Upon certification of the commission, the secretary shall appoint the producer and handler members of the initial commission’s board of directors from a list of eligible persons submitted to the secretary, or shall contact all eligible producers and handlers in each district by mail, or shall call meetings in each district for the purpose of nominating and electing persons to the commission. To be eligible for election, nominees, who may be producers or handlers, shall present to the secretary a nomination petition with the signatures of at least five eligible persons from the district from which the nominee is seeking election. Eligible persons may be nominated and elected from any district in which they produce or handle apples. Only eligible producers may vote for nominees, and each eligible producer may cast one vote in each district in which he or she produces apples. The volume of apples marketed by eligible producers who vote shall not be considered when tabulating the votes to elect members and alternate members to the commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 47.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75618.

Subsequent to the first election of members of the commission pursuant to this chapter, persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to nomination and election procedures that are adopted by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 48.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75619.

(a) Prior to the secretary holding the referendum pursuant to this article, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary determines necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the referendum.

(b) Any funds not used in carrying out this article shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) Upon the establishment of the commission, the commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out this article and for any legal expenses and other costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 49.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [75630. - 75637.]

75630.

(a) The commission shall establish the assessment for the marketing year by July 1 of each year or as soon thereafter as is possible.

(b) The assessment shall be one-fourth cent ($0.0025) per pound of apples marketed for fresh consumption during the 1994–95 marketing year. Thereafter, the assessment shall not exceed three-fourth cent ($0.0075) per pound of apples marketed for fresh consumption, except as provided in subdivision (d).

(c) Assessments provided for in this section shall be levied on the producer. The handler shall deduct the assessment from amounts paid by him or her to the producer, and is a trustee of the funds until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(d) An assessment greater than the amount provided for in subdivision (b) may not be charged unless a greater fee is approved by a majority of the commission and by eligible producers pursuant to procedures specified in Section 75612.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 51.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75631.

This chapter shall not apply to producers who produce no more than 40,000 pounds of apples per year and to production on a noncommercial basis for the producer’s home use, or where the trees are used only for ornamental purposes. Producers from whom assessments are collected may apply for the refund of the payments following the close of any marketing season in which the payments have been made, and the commission shall refund the payments if the producer can demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the commission, that he or she is not subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 53.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75632.

Every handler shall keep a complete and accurate record of all apples handled. The records shall be in simple form and contain information as the commission shall prescribe including, but not limited to, market price information and the names and addresses of the producers whose apples were packed or marketed. The records shall be retained by the handler for two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 399, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

75633.

(a) All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the secretary from producers or handlers is confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by court order in a judicial proceeding.

(b) Information on volume shipments, product value, and any other related information that is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports to the commission, or aggregate sales and inventory information, and any other information that the commission requires that gives only totals, but excludes producer or handler information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 54.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75634.

Any assessment which is imposed on the producer as provided for in this chapter is a personal debt of that producer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75635.

Every handler is personally liable for the payment of the assessments to the commission. The failure of a handler to collect the assessment shall not exempt the handler from liability and shall not relieve any producer subject to this chapter from the obligation to pay the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

75636.

Any producer or handler who fails to file a return or pay the assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, pay 1.5 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance. In addition to any other penalty imposed, the commission may require any person who fails to pay any assessment or related charge pursuant to this article to furnish and maintain a surety bond in a form and amount, and for a period of time, specified by the commission, as assurance that all payments to the commission will be made when due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 69, Sec. 55.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75637.

If the producer or handler is a corporation, all of the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for violating this chapter, including, but not limited to, failing to pay the assessments or to collect the assessments, shall also include identical liability upon each director or officer of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [75641. - 75644.]

75641.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Refuse to render a report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) Furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission. 

(c) Fail or refuse to furnish the commission or its duly authorized agents, information concerning the names and addresses of persons from whom apples have been received and the quantity so received.
